Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.540

Foreign corporations—Filing and annual license fees.

A foreign corporation doing an intrastate business or seeking to do an intrastate business in the state of Washington shall pay for the privilege of so doing the same filing and annual license fees prescribed in RCW 23B.01.520 for domestic corporations.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2110; 1989 c 165 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.